California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(b) A general description of works or appliances already installed and any other property necessary or convenient for the operation of the improvement, if the works, appliances, or property are to be acquired as part of the improvement. 

(c) An estimate of the cost of the improvement and of the cost of lands, rights-of-way, easements, and incidental expenses in connection with the improvement, including any cost of registering bonds. If the legislative body, in the resolution of intention, ordered that private utility damages be included in the assessment, the report shall contain an estimate of the private utility damages. If the legislative body, in the resolution of intention, declared its intention to levy an assessment for the maintenance, repair, or improvement of the work, system, or facility, the report shall contain an estimate of the amount of this assessment for each of the first five years during which the assessment would be levied.

(d) A diagram showing, as they existed at the time of the passage of the resolution of intention, all of the following:

(1) The exterior boundaries of the assessment district.

(2) The boundaries of any zones within the district.

(3) The lines and dimensions of each parcel of land within the district.

Each subdivision, including each separate condominium interest, as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, shall be given a separate number upon the diagram. The diagram may refer to the county assessor’s maps for a detailed description of the lines and dimensions of any parcels, in which case those maps shall govern for all details concerning the lines and dimensions of the parcels.

(e) A proposed assessment of the total amount of the cost and expenses of the proposed improvement upon the several subdivisions of land in the district in proportion to the estimated benefits to be received by each subdivision, respectively, from the improvement. In the case of an assessment for installation of planned local drainage facilities which are financed, in whole or in part, pursuant to Section 66483 of the Government Code, the assessment levied against each parcel of subdivided land may be levied on the basis of the proportionate storm water runoff from each parcel. When any portion or percentage of the cost and expenses of the improvement is ordered to be paid out of the treasury of the municipality, pursuant to Section 10201, the amount of that portion or percentage shall first be deducted from the total estimated cost and expenses of the improvement, and the assessment upon property proposed in the report shall include only the remainder of the estimated cost and expenses. The assessment shall refer to the subdivisions by their respective numbers as assigned pursuant to subdivision (d).

(f) A proposed maximum annual assessment upon each of the several subdivisions of land in the district to pay costs incurred by the city and not otherwise reimbursed which result from the administration and collection of assessments or from the administration or registration of any associated bonds and reserve or other related funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.1.

If the assessment district consists, in whole or in part, of lands subdivided or to be subdivided under the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act, Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code, none of the costs and expenses required for compliance with the Subdivision Map Act, including but not limited to surveying and engineering costs incurred in the preparation of any map required by such act, shall be included in the incidental expenses of any improvement ordered to be made or acquired under this division. Incidental expenses under this division may include:

(1) The costs and expenses of modifying any tentative or final map prepared pursuant to the Subdivision Map Act for use as the map of the assessment district or diagram; and

(2) Any surveying or engineering expenses incurred for preparation of the plans and specifications of any improvement to be constructed under this division. 

(3) Any private utility damages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.2.

If improvement bonds are to be issued pursuant to the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500)), the costs and expenses of the proposed improvement may include an allowance for interest not exceeding two years’ estimated interest on the bonds. The amount of the allowance for interest shall be paid into the redemption fund for the bonds upon sale and delivery of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 104, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.5.

In preparing the report in which assessments are apportioned pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 10204, the person or board to whom the improvement is referred by the legislative body may presume that facilities which are required to meet the needs of future residents of an area, as indicated by a general or specific plan for the area, will benefit undeveloped and underdeveloped property within the area. If the legislative body adopts the report, that presumption shall be conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1332, Sec. 12.   Effective October 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

10205.

The provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 relating to contributions are incorporated in this division as if fully set out herein.

At any time either before or after the formation of the district, the legislative body may provide by ordinance that for a period specified in the ordinance, but not exceeding the term of bonds issued or to be issued, the city may contribute, from any sources of revenue not otherwise prohibited by law, any specified amount, portion, or percentage of such revenues for the purposes set forth in such ordinance, limited to the following: the acquisition or construction of improvements, the acquisition of interests in real property and the payment of expenses incidental thereto for the use and benefit of the district. In addition, the purposes specified in the ordinance may also include the application of such revenues as a credit upon the levied assessments in the same manner as is provided in Section 10427.1. A brief statement of intention to provide such contribution of revenues shall be set forth in the resolution of intention. Such contribution shall not constitute an indebtedness or liability of the municipality. Contributions may be made from any sources of revenue not otherwise prohibited by law; provided, however, that any contributions authorized after the levy of assessment shall be from sources other than ad valorem taxes on real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

10206.

The provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 relating to assessments on publicly owned property and railroad property, and certificate or bond secured by unpaid assessments on publicly owned property, are incorporated in this division as if fully set out herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------

10207.

The provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5150) of Part 3 of the Improvement Act of 1911 are incorporated in this division as if fully set out herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

10208.

The exterior boundaries of the assessment district may be specified and described as provided in the Improvement Act of 1911.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10209.

In the assessment of land, credit may be given for dedications and for improvements constructed at private expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 739.)
-------------------------------------------

10210.

To expedite the conduct of proceedings and the making of any acquisition or improvement authorized by this division the legislative body may at any time transfer into a special fund designated by the name of the improvement proceeding, out of any available funds of the municipality, such sums as it deems necessary. The sums so transferred are a loan to the special fund, and shall be repaid out of the proceeds of the assessments provided for in this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 10209 by Stats. 1968, Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Notice, Protest, and Hearing [10300. - 10312.]

10300.

When the report provided for in Sections 10203 and 10204 is filed with the clerk, he shall present it to the legislative body for consideration. The legislative body may modify it in any respect. The report as modified shall stand as the report for the purpose of all subsequent proceedings except that it may be confirmed, modified, or corrected as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10301.

After passing on the report, the legislative body shall by resolution appoint the time and place for hearing protests to the proposed assessment and shall cause notice of that hearing and a public meeting required by Section 54954.6 of the Government Code to be mailed as provided in subdivision (c) of that section. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the legislative body shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10306.

The failure of the clerk to mail the notice to any property owner or the failure of any property owner to receive the notice shall not affect the validity of any proceedings taken under this division. If property assessed by the state under Section 14 of Article XIII of the Constitution is proposed to be assessed, the notice shall be mailed to every owner of the property at the address thereof shown on the last board roll transmitted to the county auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1234, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10310.4.

The legislative body may remedy, revise, and correct any error or informality in any act, determination, or proceeding of the legislative body or any officer of the city. The legislative body may confirm, amend, alter, modify, or correct the assessment and diagram in such manner as to it shall be just and may instruct and direct the person or board making the same to correct them in any particular.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

10311.1.

If it shall be necessary, in order to find whether a majority protest exists, to determine whether any or all of the signers of written protests are the “owners” of property to be assessed, the legislative body shall make such determination from the last equalized assessment roll. The legislative body shall be under no duty to obtain or consider any other evidence as to ownership of property and its determination of ownership shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10311.5.

If the proposed improvement includes the acquisition of any improvements constructed pursuant to the provisions of the Subdivision Map Act, Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code, and such improvements were financed, in whole or in part, from the proceeds of any loan secured by a mortgage or deed of trust upon any lands within the proposed assessment district, upon submission of evidence, satisfactory to the legislative body, of the foregoing, the mortgagee or beneficiary under any such mortgage or deed of trust may protest in the same manner and to the same extent as the owner of such lands.

Any contract by a city for the acquisition of any such improvements shall provide that, in the absence of contrary written instructions by any such mortgagee or beneficiary, the purchase price for said improvements shall be paid to the owner and to the mortgagee or beneficiary, as their interests may appear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

10312.

(a) When, upon the hearing, the proposed assessment provided for in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 10204, and the maximum annual assessment provided for in subdivision (f) of that section, are confirmed as filed, as modified, or corrected, by resolution, the legislative body shall order the proposed improvement to be made or acquired, and declare its action upon the report and assessment. The resolution shall be final as to all persons, and the assessment thereby levied upon the respective subdivisions of land in the assessment district. 

(b) If an annual assessment to pay for administrative cost is provided for pursuant to subdivision (a), the legislative body shall determine, by resolution, the amount of the annual assessment for this purpose, which shall not exceed the maximum assessment provided for in subdivision (a) and shall not exceed a reasonable estimate of costs actually incurred or likely to be incurred. This determination may be included in the resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a). The legislative body may subsequently determine by resolution that the annual assessment shall be a different amount, but in no event shall the annual assessment exceed the maximum annual assessment provided for in subdivision (a). Resolutions adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be final as to all persons, and the annual assessment in the amount determined shall thereby be levied annually until changed by resolution adopted pursuant to this section. These assessments may be collected in the same manner and in the same installments as the assessments levied pursuant to subdivision (a), and may be combined with those assessments for collection in any manner which is convenient and economical.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Change of Work, Boundaries of Assessment District, Amounts of Assessments or Proceedings [10350. - 10358.]

10350.

“Changes” as used in this chapter shall include corrections, alterations, modifications, additions, omissions, increases or decreases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

10351.

Unless the power to proceed shall have ceased at the conclusion of the hearing on the proposed improvement because of a majority protest, at any time before completion of the improvement proceedings, the legislative body may make changes in, to or from the boundaries of the proposed assessment district, the improvement ordered to be made or acquired, the assessment (including the amounts of any of the individual assessments therein), or in the proceedings, or any act, determination or provision made, or permitted to be made, by the legislative body under and pursuant to this division, which act, determination or provision does not affect the jurisdiction of the legislative body to order the improvement. The legislative body shall not change the boundaries to include any territory which will not, in its judgment, be benefited by the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

10352.

All changes shall be made on notice and hearing as herein provided, except changes may be made:

(a) At the hearing on the report, which:

(1) Reduce the total amount of the assessment or make no change in the total amount of the assessment and no increase or decrease in the amount of money assessed on each parcel of property included in the assessment; or

(2) Eliminate a portion of the work or provide a substitution therein without increasing the cost of any assessment by reason thereof or substantially affecting the distribution of benefits from the work; or

(3) Eliminate a portion of the assessment district without increasing the amount of any assessment by reason thereof or substantially affecting the distribution of benefits from the work; or

(4) Exclude territory which will not be benefited by the improvement without increasing the amount of any assessment by reason thereof; and

(b) At any time after the improvements are ordered and during the pendency of the proceedings, which;

(1) Do not increase the total amount of the assessment; or

(2) Provide for the elimination or addition of work or substitutions therein, though they result in an increase in some assessments, provided that the owners of the property affected request in writing that the changes in the work and in the assessments be made; or

(3) Exclude territory which will not be benefited by the improvement without increasing the amount of any assessment by reason thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1155.)
-------------------------------------------

10353.

Before ordering any changes made, other than as provided in Section 10352, the legislative body shall adopt a resolution briefly describing the changes proposed to be made, stating the amount of the estimated increase or decrease in the cost of the improvement by reason of the proposed changes and giving notice of a time and place when and where any interested person having any objection to the changes proposed to be made may appear before the legislative body and show cause why the changes should not be ordered. The resolution shall also contain the name and telephone number of a local department or agency designated by the legislative body to answer inquiries regarding the hearing proceedings. The resolution may describe the changes by referring to maps, plats, plans, profiles, detailed drawings, or specifications on file in the office of the clerk of the legislative body or engineer, which shall indicate the changes proposed to be made and which shall govern for all details thereof. The resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, at least 10 days prior to the date of the hearing. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the legislative body shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10354.

If said resolution proposes to include additional territory in the assessment district, or to increase any assessment, at least 20 days prior to the hearing fixed therein the clerk of the legislative body shall mail a copy of said resolution to all persons owning real property within said additional territory, or whose assessment is increased, whose names and addresses appear on the last equalized assessment roll or as known to said clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

10355.

Written objection to the proposed changes may be filed with the clerk of the legislative body by any interested person at any time not later than the time set for the hearing. The legislative body shall hear and pass upon such objections at the time appointed, or at any time to which the hearing thereof may be adjourned, and its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive. If no written objections to said changes have been delivered to the clerk up to the hour set for hearing thereon, or if said objections have been heard and found by the legislative body to be insufficient or have been overruled or denied, immediately thereupon the legislative body by an affirmative vote of four-fifths of its members shall acquire jurisdiction to order said changes made. The decisions and determinations of the legislative body ordering such changes after notice and hearing shall be final and conclusive upon all persons entitled to appeal thereupon to the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

10356.

If as a result of any proposed changes the legislative body shall determine that a supplemental assessment shall be necessary, the proceedings provided for by this chapter may either be combined with or conducted separately from the proceedings for such supplemental assessment. If said proposed changes shall eliminate or substantially reduce the estimated benefits to be received from the improvement by any subdivision of land within the assessment district, the legislative body shall not order any such changes without ordering a corresponding credit upon the individual assessment theretofore imposed upon such subdivision. Said credit shall be made in the manner provided in Section 10427.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

10357.

Any changes made pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the limitations, if any, contained in any law applicable to the proceedings, which law may impose limitations upon the amount by which the estimated cost of the improvement may be increased by reason of such changes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

10358.

Any changes made pursuant to this chapter shall not release or discharge the sureties upon any bond required under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.7. Alternative Procedure for Authorizing Assessments [10360. - 10368.]

10360.

This chapter provides an alternative procedure for authorizing assessments pursuant to this division. It is not intended to alter or restrict authority to authorize assessments pursuant to other provisions of this division in any way. This chapter does not apply to proceedings to finance public facilities unless 80 percent or more of the district is developed for residential, commercial, or industrial use at the time that proceedings are commenced. This chapter shall not be used for the acquisition of existing works, appliances, or property except insofar as the acquisition is incidental to a proposed improvement not already installed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

10362.

All provisions of this division shall apply to proceedings pursuant to this chapter, except as expressly provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

10364.

For purposes of proceeding under this chapter, the report prepared pursuant to Section 10204 shall contain the following elements instead of those specified in Section 10204:

(a) A general description of the proposed project. Detailed plans and specifications need not be included in the report.

(b) A general description of works or appliances already installed and any other property necessary or convenient for the operation of the improvement, if the work, appliance, or property is to be acquired as part of the improvement. Acquisitions are subject to the limitation specified in Section 10360.

(c) An estimate of the costs of the improvement and of the cost of lands, rights-of-way, easements, and incidental expenses in connection with the improvement. If the legislative body, in the resolution of intention, ordered that private utility damages be included in the assessment, the report shall contain an estimate of private utility damages. In addition to the estimate of the likely cost of the project, the report shall state a maximum cost of the project and any private utility damages. If the legislative body, in the resolution of intention, declared its intention to levy an assessment for the maintenance, repair, or improvement of the work, system, or facility, the report shall contain an estimate of the amount of this assessment for each of the first five years during which the assessment would be levied.

(d) A diagram showing the assessment district and the boundaries and dimensions of the subdivisions of land within the district as they existed at the time of the passage of the resolution of intent. Each subdivision, including each separate condominium interest as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code, shall be given a separate number upon the diagram.

(e) A proposed assessment of a percentage share of the cost and expense of the proposed improvement upon each subdivision of real property in the district in proportion to the estimated benefits to be received by those subdivisions, respectively, from the improvement. The amount of the proposed assessment against each subdivision of real property, assuming the improvement costs and expenses are the amount estimated in subdivision (c) and assuming the project costs and expenses are the maximum amount stated in subdivision (c). When any portion or percentage of the cost and expenses of the improvement is ordered to be paid out of the treasury of the municipality, pursuant to Section 10201, the amount of that portion or percentage shall first be deducted from the total estimated costs and expenses of the improvement and from the maximum costs and expenses of the project, and the assessment upon property proposed in the report shall include only the remainder of the estimated costs and expenses. The assessment shall refer to the subdivisions by their respective numbers as assigned pursuant to subdivision (d).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

10366.

(a) For purposes of proceeding under this chapter, the notice shall contain the following elements:

(1) A statement of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing on the resolution of intention and report.

(2) A statement of the total estimated cost of the proposed improvement and of the maximum cost of the improvement.

(3) The estimated and maximum amounts, as shown by the report, to be assessed against the particular parcel covered by the notice.

(4) A statement that any person interested may file a protest in writing as provided in this division.

(b) If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the legislative body shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10368.

For purposes of proceeding under this chapter, the assessment shall be confirmed as follows instead of the procedure specified in Section 10312.

When upon the hearing the proposal to assess is confirmed as filed, modified, or corrected by resolution, the legislative body shall order the proposed improvement to be made and declare its action upon the report and assessment. After design work and plans and specifications have been completed, and after contracts have been let pursuant to Section 10501, the legislative body shall, by resolution, fix the amount of the assessment, which shall be equal to or less than the maximum assessment stated in the report prepared pursuant to Section 10364, as filed, modified, or corrected. If the amount of the assessment is more than the estimated cost of the project stated in the report prepared pursuant to Section 10364, as filed, modified, or corrected, the legislative body shall include, within the resolution fixing the amount of the assessment, an explanation for the increase over the estimated cost of the project. In no case shall the amount of the assessment exceed the maximum assessment stated in the report, as filed, modified, or corrected. Resolutions adopted pursuant to this section shall be final as to all persons, and the assessment fixed shall be thereby levied upon the respective subdivisions of land in the assessment district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Levying and Collecting the Assessment [10400. - 10508.]

10400.

The validity of an assessment or supplementary assessment levied under this division shall not be contested in any action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding is commenced within 30 days after the assessment is levied. Any appeal from a final judgment in such an action or proceeding shall be perfected within 30 days after the entry of judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10401.

Upon the passage of the resolutions provided for in Section 10312, the clerk of the legislative body shall, if bonds are to be issued, transmit to the superintendent of streets, or if no bonds are to be issued, to the city tax collector the diagram and assessments adopted pursuant to Section 10312. If other than a municipal corporation is conducting the proceeding, the diagram and assessment shall be transmitted to and recorded by the corresponding officer of the entity conducting the proceeding, which officer shall be the county surveyor if a county is conducting the proceeding, and that officer shall perform the duties provided in this division for the tax collector. If neither a municipal corporation nor a county is conducting the proceeding, a certified copy of the diagram and assessment shall be recorded with the county surveyor if all or any part of the improvement district is in unincorporated territory, and with the superintendent of streets or tax collector of the city if all or any part of the improvement district is an incorporated territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

10402.

The tax collector shall record the diagram and assessment received pursuant to Section 10401 in a substantial book to be kept for that purpose in his office. Upon the date of recordation with the tax collector or, if a certified copy is recorded with the county surveyor or the superintendent of streets of the city, or both, as provided in Section 10401, then upon the date of recordation, the assessment becomes due and payable, except that the legislative body may provide in the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 10312 that all or any portion of the assessment becomes due and payable on the date of the bonds which represent the assessments or portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

10402.5.

Upon the passage of the resolution provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 10312, the city clerk shall record a notice of assessment, as provided for in Section 3114, modified to reflect any annual assessment for administrative cost, whereupon the assessment shall attach as a lien upon the property assessed, as provided in Section 3115, except that the annual assessment for administrative cost shall become a lien at the same time as the property tax becomes a lien each year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1388, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

10403.

All assessments not paid within 30 days after they become due, except all unpaid assessments for which bonds are to be issued, shall become delinquent and the recording officer shall add to each delinquent assessment 5 percent of the amount thereof. Assessments may be paid in whole or in part during the 30-day period after the same become due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1306.)
-------------------------------------------

10404.

(a) Notice of recordation of assessment shall be given as provided in this section.

(b) Upon recording of the assessment, the collection officer shall mail, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 5070, a statement containing all of the following:

(1) A designation by street number, or some other description, of the property assessed sufficient to enable the owner to identify it.

(2) The amount of the assessment.

(3) The date of the recordation of the assessment.

(4) The time and place of payment of the assessment and the effect of failure to pay within such time.

(5) If bonds are to be issued, a statement of that fact designating the act pursuant to which such bonds are to be issued.

(c) The failure of the collection officer to mail the notice to any property owner or the failure of any property owner to receive the notice shall not affect the validity of any proceedings taken under this division.

(d) The collection officer also shall give notice by publication pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, which notice shall state all of the following:

(1) That the assessment has been recorded as provided in Section 10402, and that all sums assessed therein are due and payable immediately.

(2) That the payment of such sums is to be made to the collection officer within 30 days after the date of recording the assessment, which date shall be stated in the notice.

(3) If bonds are not to be issued, that all assessments will become delinquent if not paid before the expiration of that 30 days and the effect of the failure to pay the assessments within the 30-day period.

(4) If bonds are to be issued, the effect of the failure to pay the assessments within the 30-day period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 394.)
-------------------------------------------

10405.

The tax collector shall fix a time and place for the sale of various parcels of land upon which the assessments are unpaid, which date shall be not less than 60 days nor more than six months after the date of the recordation of the diagram and assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10406.

When the resolution of intention does not provide for the issuance of bonds, the tax collector of the entity conducting the proceedings shall give the notice of recording the assessment and collect and receive the assessments, and proceedings shall be had as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10407.

Within 30 days after the date of the delinquency, the tax collector shall begin the publication of a notice of sale of the property upon which the assessments have not been paid. The publication shall be made in the city pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1044.)
-------------------------------------------

10408.

The notice of sale published pursuant to Section 10407 need not set out the description of the various parcels of land at length, but shall describe the parcels by their respective number as they appear upon the assessment and diagram. The notice shall refer to the assessment and diagram. Opposite the description or designation of each parcel of land shall be set out the name of the owner as it appears on the last equalized assessment roll for city taxes or as known to the tax collector, the amount assessed against the parcel, the penalty for delinquency, a fee which is required to reimburse the municipality for the estimated reasonable cost of providing notice pursuant to Section 10408.5, and the costs of sale chargeable to the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 475, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

10408.5.

(a) Not less than 45 days nor more than 60 days prior to the date of sale, the tax collector shall send notice by registered mail to the last known mailing address, if available, of parties of interest, as defined in Section 6505.4. The content of the notice shall include the date, time, and place of the proposed sale, and the amount required to redeem prior to the time of the sale.

(b) The tax collector shall make a reasonable effort to obtain the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest.

(c) The validity of any sale under this chapter is not affected if the tax collector’s reasonable effort fails to disclose the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest or if a party of interest does not receive the mailed notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 475, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

10409.

At least 15 days prior to the date of the sale, the tax collector shall mail, postage prepaid, notices of sale to the owners of all property upon which the assessments have not been paid, as they appear on the last equalized assessment roll for city taxes or as known to the tax collector. The various parcels shall be designated by their legal description or by street number in addition to their respective numbers as they appear upon the assessment and diagram. Opposite the description and designation of each parcel in the notice shall be set out the amount assessed against the property, the penalty for delinquency, a fee which is required to reimburse the municipality for the estimated reasonable cost of providing notice pursuant to Section 10408.5, and the portion of the costs of the sale chargeable to the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 475, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

10410.

Upon the completion of the publishing and mailing of the notices of sale, the tax collector shall file with the legislative body an affidavit setting forth the time and manner of the compliance with the requirements for publishing and mailing the notices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10411.

At any time after delinquency and prior to the sale of any parcels of land assessed and delinquent, any person may pay the assessment, and penalties and costs due on the property, including the cost of advertising if the payment is made after the first publication of the notice of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10412.

At the time and place fixed in the notice, the tax collector shall proceed with the sale of the property advertised, commencing at the head of the list and continuing in numerical order of lots or parcels of land until all are sold. He may postpone or continue the sale from day to day until the sale is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10413.

The tax collector shall sell separately each parcel of land in the published notice on which the assessment remains unpaid, or so much of it as is necessary to realize the amount assessed against the parcel and penalties and costs, and fifty cents ($0.50) for a certificate of sale. If there is no other purchaser for any lot or parcel of land so offered for sale, it shall be struck off to the city as purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10414.

For each sale the tax collector shall issue an original and duplicate certificate of sale, referring to the proceedings, describing the parcel sold, and giving the name of the purchaser and the amount for which the parcel was sold. He shall deliver the original certificate to the purchaser and keep the duplicate on file in his office, in the form of a stub, in the certificate book.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10415.

At any time before the expiration of one year from the date of the sale, any property sold pursuant to this chapter may be redeemed by payment to the tax collector of the amount for which it was sold and an additional penalty at the rate of 1 percent of the amount a month until paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

10416.
